California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) As used in this section, “natural disaster” means fire, flood, storm, epidemic, riot, or earthquake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 936, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.7.

The total percentage deducted from wagers at satellite wagering facilities in the northern zone shall be the same as the deductions for wagers at the racetrack where the racing meeting is being conducted and shall be distributed as set forth in this section. Amounts deducted under this section shall be distributed as follows:

(a) (1) For thoroughbred meetings, 1.3 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers shall be distributed to the racing association for payment to the state as a license fee, 2 percent shall be distributed to the satellite wagering facility as a commission for the right to do business as a franchise, but not for the use of any real property, 0.54
 percent shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2, 0.033 percent shall be distributed to the Center for Equine Health, and 0.067 percent shall be distributed to the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory, School of Veterinary Medicine, University of California at Davis. It is the intent of the Legislature that the 0.033 percent of funds distributed to the Center for Equine Health shall supplement, and not supplant, other funding sources.

(2) (A) In addition to the distributions specified in paragraph (1), for thoroughbred meetings, an amount not to exceed 4 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2 with the mutual consent
 of the racing association, the organization representing the horsemen participating in the meeting, and the board from January 1, 2010, until December 31, 2016. However, the amount shall not be less than that specified in subparagraph (B), and any amount greater than the amount specified in subparagraph (B) shall be approved by the board for no more than 12 months at a time, and only upon a determination by the board that the greater amount is in the economic interest of thoroughbred racing.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2017, an amount not to exceed the amount of actual operating expenses, as determined by the board, or 2.5 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers, whichever is less, shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2.

(C) A request to the board for a distribution pursuant to subparagraph (A)
 shall be accompanied by a report detailing all receipts and expenditures over the two prior fiscal years of the funds affected by the request.

(D) The racing association whose request pursuant to subparagraph (A) has been approved by the board shall provide subsequent quarterly reports of receipts and expenditures of the affected funds if requested by the board.

(b) For harness, quarter horse, Appaloosa, Arabian, or mixed breed meetings, 0.4 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers shall be distributed to the racing association for payment to the state as a license fee, for fair meetings, 1 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers shall be distributed to the fair association for payment to the state as a license fee, 2 percent shall be distributed to the satellite
 wagering facility as a commission for the right to do business as a franchise, but not for the use of any real property, and 6 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility or the amount of actual operating expenses, as determined by the board, whichever is less, shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2. In addition, in the case of quarter horses, 0.4 percent shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7; in the case of Appaloosas, 0.4 percent shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.9 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.9; in the case of Arabians, 0.4 percent shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to Section 19617.8, and
 shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with Section 19617.8; in the case of standardbreds, 0.4 percent shall be distributed for the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program pursuant to Section 19619; in the case of thoroughbreds, 0.48 percent shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2; 0.033 percent shall be distributed to the Center for Equine Health; and 0.067 percent shall be distributed to the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory, School of Veterinary Medicine, University of California at Davis. It is the intent of the Legislature that the 0.033 percent of funds distributed to the Center for Equine Health shall supplement, and not supplant, other funding sources.

(c) In addition to the distributions specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), for mixed breed
 meetings, 1 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2 for promotion of the program at satellite wagering facilities. For harness meetings, 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2 for the promotion of the program at satellite wagering facilities, and 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility shall be distributed according to a written agreement for each race meeting between the licensed racing association and the organization representing the horsemen participating in the meeting. If, with respect to harness meetings, there are funds unexpended from this 1 percent, these funds may be expended for other purposes with the consent of the horsemen and the racing association to benefit the horsemen, or the racing association, or both, pursuant to their agreement. For quarter horse
 meetings, 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility on races run in California shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2 for the promotion of the program at satellite wagering facilities, 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility on out-of-state and out-of-country imported races shall be distributed to the official quarter horse registering agency for the purposes of Section 19617.75, and 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility on all races shall be distributed according to a written agreement for each race meeting between the licensed racing association and the organization representing the horsemen participating in the meeting.

(d) Additionally, for thoroughbred, harness, quarter horse, mixed breed, and fair meetings, 0.33 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility shall be paid to the
 city or county in which the satellite wagering facility is located pursuant to Section 19610.3 or 19610.4.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a racing association is responsible for the payment of the state license fee as required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 21.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.71.

The total percentage deducted from wagers at satellite wagering facilities in the central and southern zones shall be the same as the percentage deducted from wagers at the racetrack where the racing meeting is being conducted and shall be distributed as set forth in this section. Amounts deducted by a satellite wagering facility under this section shall be distributed as follows:

(a) (1) For thoroughbred meetings, 2 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers shall be distributed to the racing association for payment to the state as a license fee, 2 percent shall be distributed to the satellite wagering facility as a
 commission for the right to do business, as a franchise, and this commission is not for the use of any real property, 0.54 percent shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2, 0.033 percent shall be distributed to the Center for Equine Health, and 0.067 percent shall be distributed to the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory, School of Veterinary Medicine, University of California at Davis. It is the intent of the Legislature that the 0.033 percent of funds distributed to the Center for Equine Health shall supplement, and not supplant, other funding sources.

(2) (A) In addition to the distributions specified in paragraph (1), for thoroughbred meetings, an amount not to exceed 4 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic
 wagers shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2 with the mutual consent of the racing association, the organization representing the horsemen participating in the meeting, and the board from January 1, 2010, until December 31, 2013. However, the amount shall be no less than that specified in subparagraph (B), and any amount greater than the amount specified in subparagraph (B) shall be approved by the board for no more than 12 months at a time, and only upon a determination by the board that the greater amount is in the economic interest of thoroughbred racing.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2014, an amount not to exceed the amount of actual operating expenses, as determined by the board, or 2.5 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers, whichever is less, shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2.

(C) A request to the board for a distribution pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be accompanied by a report detailing all receipts and expenditures over the two prior fiscal years of the funds affected by the request.

(D) The racing association whose request pursuant to subparagraph (A) has been approved by the board shall provide subsequent quarterly reports of receipts and expenditures of the affected funds if requested by the board. 

(b) For harness, quarter horse, Appaloosa, Arabian, or mixed breed meetings, 0.4 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers shall be distributed to the racing association for payment to the state as a license fee, for fair meetings, 1 percent of the amount handled by the
 satellite wagering facility on conventional and exotic wagers shall be distributed to the racing association for payment to the state as a license fee, 2 percent shall be distributed to the satellite wagering facility as a commission for the right to do business, as a franchise, and this commission is not for the use of any real property, and 6 percent of the amount handled by the satellite wagering facility or the amount of actual operating expenses, as determined by the board, whichever is less, distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2. In addition, in the case of quarter horses, 0.4 percent shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7; in the case of Appaloosas, 0.4 percent shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.9 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance
 with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.9; in the case of Arabians, 0.4 percent shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency, pursuant to Section 19617.8, and thereafter shall be distributed in accordance with Section 19617.8; in the case of standardbreds, 0.4 percent shall be distributed for the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program pursuant to Section 19619; in the case of thoroughbreds, 0.48 percent shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2 and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2; 0.033 percent shall be distributed to the Center for Equine Health; and 0.067 percent shall be distributed to the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory, School of Veterinary Medicine, University of California at Davis. It is the intent of the Legislature that the 0.033 percent of funds distributed to the Center for Equine Health
 shall supplement, and not supplant, other funding sources.

(c) In addition, for Appaloosa and mixed breed meetings, 1 percent shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2 for promotion of the program at satellite wagering facilities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on wagers made in the Counties of Orange and Los Angeles on thoroughbred races conducted in the County of Orange or Los Angeles, or both, excluding the 50th District Agricultural Association, the amount deducted for promotion of the satellite wagering program at satellite wagering facilities shall be 0.5 percent. Any of the promotion funds that are not distributed in the year in which they are collected may be distributed in the following year. If promotion funds distributed in any year exceed the amount collected for that year, the funds distributed in the following year shall be reduced by the excess amount. For harness meetings, 0.5 percent of
 the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2 for the promotion of the program at satellite wagering facilities, and 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility shall be distributed according to a written agreement for each race meeting between the licensed racing association and the organization representing the horsemen participating in the meeting. For quarter horse meetings 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by satellite wagering facility on races run in California shall be distributed to an organization described in Section 19608.2 for the promotion of the program at satellite wagering facilities, 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility on out-of-state and out-of-country imported races shall be distributed to the official quarter horse registering agency for the purposes of Section 19617.75, and 0.5 percent of the total amount handled by each
 satellite wagering facility on all races shall be distributed according to a written agreement for each race meeting between the licensed racing association and the organization representing the horseman participating in the meeting.

(d) Additionally, for thoroughbred, harness, quarter horse, mixed breed, and fair meetings, 0.33 percent of the total amount handled by the satellite wagering facility shall be paid to the city or county in which the satellite wagering facility is located pursuant to Section 19610.3 or 19610.4.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a racing association is responsible for the payment of the state license fee as required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 650, Sec. 4.   (AB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.72.

(a) In addition to the amounts deducted and distributed pursuant to Section 19605.7, an amount equal to 1.25 percent of the total amount handled on thoroughbred races conducted by, or disseminated by, a thoroughbred racing association or fair at a satellite facility that is located on the premises where, and on days when, harness races are being conducted in the northern zone, shall be paid to the harness racing association and thereafter shall be distributed as purses to the harness horsemen racing at the harness racing meeting.

(b) In addition to the amounts deducted and distributed pursuant to Section 19605.71, an amount equal to 1.25 percent of the total amount handled on thoroughbred races conducted by, or disseminated by, a thoroughbred racing association or fair at a satellite facility that is located on the premises where, and during calendar periods when, quarter horse or harness race meetings are being conducted in Orange County, shall be distributed as purses to the horsemen racing at the quarter horse or harness racing meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 613, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.74.

For every year that the organization operating the Breeders’ Cup World Championship series chooses to conduct the Breeders’ Cup at a race meeting in California, the following, notwithstanding any other law, shall apply to the race meeting conducting the Breeders’ Cup races on days during which Breeders’ Cup races are conducted:

(a) The amounts that would have otherwise been distributed to a purse account pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19601.02 shall be made available to the organization operating the Breeders’ Cup World Championship series for the purpose of promoting and supporting the Breeders’ Cup, including the payment of purses in Breeders’ Cup World Championship races.

(b) The thoroughbred racing association hosting the Breeders’ Cup shall enter into a written agreement, in consultation and cooperation with the California Tourism Commission and the statewide marketing organization formed pursuant to Section 19605.73, with the organization that operates the Breeders’ Cup regarding the manner in which the funds set aside to support and promote the Breeders’ Cup are to be expended.

(c) Within 90 days after the holding of each Breeders’ Cup, a written report that includes a parimutuel audit shall be made to the board detailing the manner in which the set-aside funds were utilized to promote and support the Breeders’ Cup, including the payment of purses in Breeders’ Cup races.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, on days during which Breeders’ Cup races are conducted in California, the board
 may authorize parimutuel wagering on Breeders’ Cup races to be run at the host venue and on one nonthoroughbred race specified in the host venue’s license application approved by the board. Amounts deducted and distributed pursuant to this chapter from wagering on the specified nonthoroughbred race shall be deducted and distributed as if the wagers were placed on a thoroughbred race.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (SB 819)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.75.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the existence of high caliber thoroughbred racing in California is important to this state’s agricultural economy. The California horse racing industry is being threatened by the escalating costs of doing business in California, including, but not limited to, workers’ compensation insurance costs, in that these costs are not only causing thoroughbred horses and trainers to leave this state, but are also discouraging owners and trainers from bringing horses into this state to compete. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide some relief from these escalating costs through the redistribution of the parimutuel handle on exotic wagers.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 19610, every thoroughbred association and fair that conducts a racing meet shall deduct an additional 0.5 percent of the total amount handled in exotic parimutuel pools of thoroughbred races.

(c) The funds collected pursuant to subdivision (b) from exotic parimutuel pools on thoroughbred races within the inclosure of a thoroughbred association or fair conducting a race meeting, at satellite wagering facilities within this state, and through advance deposit wagering by residents of this state, shall be distributed to the organization described in subdivision (f) to be used in accordance with subdivision (e).

(d) Any thoroughbred association or fair that authorizes a betting system located outside of this state to accept exotic wagers on its races and to combine those wagers in the association’s or fair’s exotic parimutuel pools, including,
 but not limited to, a multijurisdictional wagering hub as to exotic wagers made by residents other than those of this state, shall deduct the amount specified in subdivision (b) in addition to any other applicable deductions specified in law. The amount deducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed to the organization described in subdivision (f) to be used in accordance with subdivision (e). This additional deduction shall not be included in the amount on which license fees are determined pursuant to Section 19602.

(e) The amounts distributed to the organization described in subdivision (f) shall be deposited by that organization in a separate account to defray the costs of workers’ compensation insurance incurred in connection with thoroughbred horses that race in this state at thoroughbred associations and racing fairs through the payment of supplemental premiums that reduce rates, payment to or for the benefit of trainers and
 owners of such thoroughbreds, based on the number of such thoroughbreds they start, in order to reimburse them for the costs of workers’ compensation insurance directly or indirectly incurred by them, and other appropriate payments. Any funds that are not used for the purposes set forth in this subdivision shall, after an affirmative vote of at least 25 of the voting interests of the organization described in subdivision (f), either be carried forward to the subsequent year, or be used to reimburse racing associations for the actual cost of health and safety programs, research or safety equipment, or making capital improvements that are designed to prevent workplace accidents and increase the safety of jockeys, exercise riders, backstretch employees, and other racetrack personnel. Those capital improvements shall include, but not be limited to, safety improvements to racing and training surfaces. All requests for reimbursements shall be approved by the board. In developing proposals for approval by the
 board, the association shall confer with their horsemen’s organizations and all affected labor organizations or associations.

(f) The thoroughbred racing associations and the owners’ organization described in subdivision (b) of Section 19613 shall form an organization to which funds shall be distributed pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d). This organization shall have a total of 34 voting interests, of which 16 shall be allocated to the organization representing thoroughbred owners pursuant to Section 19613, one shall be allocated to the official registering agency for thoroughbreds in California, and one shall be allocated to the organization representing thoroughbred trainers pursuant to Section 19613. The remaining 16 votes shall be allocated among the licensed racing associations and racing fairs in the state. Each racing association and fair shall receive the portion of these remaining votes represented by the sum of exotic wagering on
 its races divided by the statewide total of exotic wagering in the preceding calendar year, excluding Breeders’ Cup races. Fractional voting shall be permitted. Any decision of this organization with respect to the allocation of funds pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) shall require the affirmative vote of 25 of these voting interests. In the event that the required number of affirmative votes cannot be obtained, the matter shall be submitted to the board for a decision consistent with subdivision (e), and the decision of the board shall be final.

(g) The organization formed pursuant to this section shall account annually to the board with respect to the expenditure and distribution of funds received by the organization pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d), and shall obtain an independent audit of fund generation and distribution. A copy of the completed audit shall be forwarded to the board within 45 days of its receipt by the
 organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   (SB 777)   Effective March 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.76.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19610, a quarter horse racing association may deduct an additional 0.5 percent of the total amount handled in its exotic parimutuel pools. This additional deduction shall only be permitted with the approval of the organization representing quarter horse horsemen and horsewomen at the applicable racing association meet.

(b) Any funds collected pursuant to subdivision (a) from exotic parimutuel pools on races within the inclosure of a racetrack, at satellite wagering facilities within this state, and through advance deposit wagering by residents of this state, shall be distributed to the organization described in subdivision (e) to be used in accordance with subdivision
 (d).

(c) Any quarter horse racing association that authorizes a betting system located outside of this state to accept exotic wagers on its races and to combine those wagers in the association’s exotic parimutuel pools, including, but not limited to, a multijurisdictional wagering hub as to exotic wagers made by residents other than those of this state, may deduct the amount specified in subdivision (a) in addition to any other applicable deductions specified in law. Any amount deducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed to the organization described in subdivision (e) to be used in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (d). This additional deduction shall not be included in the amount on which license fees are determined pursuant to Section 19602.

(d) The amounts distributed to the organization described in subdivision (e) shall be deposited by that
 organization in a separate account to defray workers’ compensation insurance costs for trainers and owners who are racing horses at the applicable quarter horse racing association meet. Any funds not expended for this purpose in the calendar year in which they are collected may either be used for the following year’s workers’ compensation costs, as specified above, or to benefit the purse pools at the track where the funds are generated. Funds to benefit purse pools shall be allocated by breed, in the same proportions as each breed generated in deductions under this section at the track in the year the funds were collected.

(e) The quarter horse racing association and the organization representing quarter horse horsemen and horsewomen shall form an organization to which any funds deducted pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be distributed. The quarter horse associations collectively shall have representation equal to that of the
 organization representing quarter horse horsemen and horsewomen on the governing board of the organization formed pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the quarter horse racing association and the organization representing quarter horse horsemen and horsewomen cannot agree on the manner for distributing these funds to defray the costs of workers’ compensation insurance, the matter shall be submitted to the board for a decision consistent with subdivision (d), and the decision of the board shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 6, Sec. 2.   (SB 777)   Effective March 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.77.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19610, a harness racing association may deduct an additional 1 percent of the total amount handled in conventional parimutuel pools of harness races. This additional deduction shall only be permitted with the approval of the organization representing harness horsemen and horsewomen at the applicable racing association meeting.

(b) Any funds collected pursuant to subdivision (a) from conventional parimutuel pools on harness races within the inclosure of a racetrack, at satellite wagering facilities within this state, and through advance deposit wagering by residents of this state, shall be distributed to the organization described in subdivision (e) to be used in accordance
 with subdivision (d).

(c) Any harness racing association that authorizes a betting system located outside of this state to accept conventional wagers on its races and to combine those wagers in the association’s conventional parimutuel pools, including, but not limited to, a multijurisdictional wagering hub as to conventional wagers made by residents other than those of this state, may deduct the amount specified in subdivision (a) in addition to any other applicable deductions specified in law. Any amount deducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed to the organization described in subdivision (e) to be used in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (d). This additional deduction shall not be included in the amount on which license fees are determined pursuant to Section 19602.

(d) The amounts distributed to the organization described in subdivision (e) shall
 be deposited by that organization in a separate account and used to reduce the workers’ compensation insurance costs for trainers who are racing horses at the applicable harness racing association meet. Any funds not expended for this purpose in the calendar year in which they are collected may either be used for the following year’s workers’ compensation costs, as specified above, or to benefit the harness purse pool at the track where the funds are generated.

(e) The harness racing association and the organization representing harness horsemen and horsewomen shall form an organization to which any funds deducted pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be distributed. The harness associations collectively shall have representation equal to that of the organization representing harness horsemen and horsewomen on the governing board of the organization formed pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the harness racing association and the organization representing harness horsemen and horsewomen cannot agree on the manner for distributing these funds to defray the costs of workers’ compensation insurance, the matter shall be submitted to the board for a decision consistent with subdivision (d), and the decision of the board shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.   (SB 777)   Effective March 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.78.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19610 and in addition to the deduction specified in subdivision (b) of Section 19605.75, a fair may deduct an additional 0.5 percent of the total amount handled in exotic parimutuel pools of races for any breed, other than races solely for thoroughbreds. This additional deduction shall only be permitted for a breed’s races with the approval of the organization representing the horsemen and horsewomen of that breed at the fair.

(b) Any funds collected pursuant to subdivision (a) from exotic parimutuel pools on races within the inclosure of a racetrack, at satellite wagering facilities within this state, and through advance deposit wagering by residents of this state, shall
 be distributed to the organization described in subdivision (e) to be used in accordance with subdivision (d).

(c) Any fair that authorizes a betting system located outside of this state to accept exotic wagers on its races and to combine those wagers in the association’s exotic parimutuel pools, including, but not limited to, a multijurisdictional wagering hub as to exotic wagers made by residents other than those of this state, may deduct the amount specified in subdivision (a) in addition to any other applicable deductions specified in law. Any amount deducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed to the organization described in subdivision (e) to be used in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (d). This additional deduction shall not be included in the amount on which license fees are determined pursuant to Section 19602.

(d) The amounts distributed to
 the organization described in subdivision (e) shall be deposited by that organization in a separate account to defray workers’ compensation insurance costs for trainers and owners who are racing breeds other than thoroughbreds at the applicable fair. Any funds not expended for this purpose in the calendar year in which they are collected may either be used for the following year’s workers’ compensation costs, as specified above, or to benefit the purse pool of each breed at the particular fair where the funds are generated in the same proportions as each breed generated at that fair in the year the funds are collected.

(e) The fairs and the organizations representing the horsemen and horsewomen of each breed for which deductions have been approved under subdivision (a) shall form an organization to which any funds deducted pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be distributed. The fairs collectively shall have representation equal to the
 collective representation of the organizations representing horsemen and horsewomen on the governing board of the organization formed pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the fairs and the organizations representing horsemen and horsewomen cannot agree on the manner for distributing these funds to defray the costs of workers’ compensation insurance, the matter shall be submitted to the board for a decision consistent with subdivision (d), and the decision of the board shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 6, Sec. 4.   (SB 777)   Effective March 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.79.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the event there are at any time uncommitted surplus funds in accounts created pursuant to Sections 19605.73 and 19605.75, those unexpended funds may, at the written request of the organization governing those funds and with the approval of the board, be reallocated to any other fund or account created pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Requests to the board to reallocate funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by a report detailing all receipts and expenditures over the two prior fiscal years of the funds affected by the request.

(c) Initial board approval of a request to reallocate funds pursuant
 to subdivision (a) shall be limited to a one-year period. Approval of a reallocation may be extended beyond one year upon a determination by the board that the extension is in the economic interest of thoroughbred racing.

(d) The organization whose written request pursuant to subdivision (a) has been approved by the board shall provide subsequent quarterly reports of receipts and expenditures of the affected funds if requested by the board.

(e) The organization whose written request pursuant to subdivision (a) has been approved by the board shall file a report with the board and the respective fiscal committees and committees on governmental organization of the Senate and the Assembly accounting for all receipts and expenditures in any of the affected funds. This report shall be filed within one year of initial board approval and annually thereafter if the approval is extended by
 the board.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19605.10 by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 23.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.8.

For thoroughbred meetings, the funds remaining after distribution of the amounts set forth in Sections 19605.7, 19605.71, and 19605.72 shall be distributed 50 percent as commissions to the association that conducts the racing meeting and 50 percent as purses to the horsemen participating in the racing meeting. From the amount distributed as purses, a sum equal to 0.07 percent of the handle shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 335, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.9.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in the central and southern zones, all of the funds distributed for purses from satellite wagering facilities shall go to the purse program of the association conducting the racing meeting.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), all funds for distribution as purses at satellite wagering facilities which are racing fairs in the County of Los Angeles from wagering on thoroughbred horse racing conducted at the 22nd District Agricultural Association Fairgrounds shall be paid to a racing fair in the County of Los Angeles for supplementing purses at the fair meeting. Commencing January 1, 1992, the funds distributed for purses from satellite
 wagering facilities pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed the amount distributed during the 1990 calendar year. Any funds in excess of this amount shall be distributed as purses at the racing meeting conducted by the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 650, Sec. 5.   (AB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19606.

(a) For harness, quarter horse, Appaloosa, Arabian, mixed breed, and fair meetings, the funds remaining after the distribution of the amounts set forth in Sections 19605.7 and 19605.71 shall be distributed 50 percent as commissions to the association that conducts the racing meeting and 50 percent to the horsemen participating in the racing meeting in the form of purses. However, owners’ premiums shall be paid from the amount distributed for purses in the same relative percentage as owners’ premiums are paid at the racing meeting, except that for thoroughbred races the owners’ premiums shall be as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 19605.8.

(b) In addition to funds distributed under Sections 19605.7 and 19605.71, from the amount that would be distributed to harness racing horsemen in the form of purses under this section, an amount equal to 0.1 percent of the amount handled on conventional and exotic wagers on standardbreds at satellite wagering facilities in California shall be distributed for the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program pursuant to Section 19619.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19606.1.
